test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0i-diitlah_run.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - diitł'á[run] :
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       distł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       díítł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       diitł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [diìtł'á, daàtł'á]
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàdiìtł'á, dàdaàtł'á]
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       dastł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: dàdastł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       gidiitł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: dàgidiitł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       ts'idiitł'á
    diitł'á[run]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: dàts'idiitł'á
